Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1503
Lien; period enforceable.

From the time of filing such lien upon any such mare or cow the lienor shall have the right to hold the same on such mare or cow and its offspring for a period of twelve months from and after the birth of such offspring; but if such lien shall not be foreclosed within that time the same shall expire and be of no force or effect.

Laws 1913, c. 49, § 3, p. 156;

R.S.1913, § 92;

C.S.1922, § 100;

C.S.1929, § 54-204;

Laws 1935, c. 120, § 1, p. 438;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 54-204;

R.S.1943, § 54-204;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 54-204.